Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1075
Biological control agent, defined.

Biological control agent shall mean a parasite, predator, pathogen, or competitive organism intentionally released by humans for the purposes of biological control with the intent of causing a reduction of a host or prey population.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 4.